Utah statutes.
75-1-312.   Alternative resolution of disputes.

(1)  A will, trust, or power of attorney may include a provision, enforceable by a court, that requires the resolution of disputes between or among beneficiaries and fiduciaries of the will, trust, or power of attorney, or any combination of those persons or entities, outside of a court of record.

(2)  The resolution of disputes outside the court may include any procedure, writing, or agreement, not contrary to or prohibited by law, found or referred to in a will, trust, or power of attorney, the purpose of which is to resolve disputes between or among the beneficiaries and fiduciaries of a will, trust, or power of attorney, or any combination of those persons or entities, outside of a court of record.

(3)  Unless terms in a dispute resolution procedure, writing, or agreement require binding arbitration, nothing in the writing or agreement shall prevent beneficiaries or fiduciaries, upon satisfaction of the required terms of the dispute resolution procedure, writing, or agreement, from seeking resolution of unresolved disputes in a court of record.



Enacted by Chapter 369, 2013 General Session

